District of Columbia statutes.
16-3501

Persons against whom issued; civil action.

A quo warranto may be issued from the United States District Court for the District of Columbia in the name of the United States against a person who within the District of Columbia usurps, intrudes into, or unlawfully holds or exercises, a franchise conferred by the United States or a public office of the United States, civil or military. The proceedings shall be deemed a civil action.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 602, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1981 Ed., § 16-3501.
1973 Ed., § 16-3501.